Utah statutes.
56-2-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Broken or defective" means any defects in the wheels, trucks, draft gears, couplers, brakes, draft and center sills, of any car, coach, locomotive, or other rolling stock of a railroad company and every other defect in any car, coach, locomotive or other rolling stock which would be dangerous to the public or to any employee of a railroad company while said car is being moved, hauled or transported.

(2)  "Local yard service" means the movement of any car, coach, locomotive or other rolling stock in the railroad yards of any railroad company and between the railroad yards of one or more railroad companies where the distance does not exceed eight miles.

